Maryland, session 2026, SB0978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
16–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) (1) “Faculty” means employees whose assignments involve academic
responsibilities, including teachers and department heads.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0978*

SENATE BILL 978
(2) “Faculty” does not include officers, supervisory employees, confidential
employees, part–time faculty, or student assistants.
(o) (1) “Public employee” means an employee employed by a public employer.
(2) “Public employee” includes faculty and part–time faculty at the
Baltimore City Community College.
(3) “Public employee” does not include:
(i) Officers;
(ii) Supervisory or confidential employees; or
(iii) Student assistants.
(Q) (1) “SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE WHO HAS
AUTHORITY TO:
(I) HIRE, TRANSFER, SUSPEND, LAY OFF, RECALL, PROMOTE,
DISCHARGE, ASSIGN, REWARD, OR DISCIPLINE EMPLOYEES;
(II) RESPONSIBLY DIRECT EMPLOYEES FOR MORE THAN 50%
OF THE EMPLOYEE’S WORKING HOURS; AND
(III) ADDRESS AND RESOLVE EMPLOYEE COMPLAINTS.
(2) “SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DEPARTMENT
HEAD OR AN EMPLOYEE IN A COMPARABLE POSITION OR ANY FACULTY MEMBER
BELOW THE LEVEL OF ASSISTANT DEAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.